Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2006XC (3) 91 th/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.89, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. Authority to take possession of abandoned vehicles. A 3 police authority, upon the authorityâs own initiative or 4 upon the request of any other authority having the duties of 5 control of highways or traffic, shall take into custody an 6 abandoned vehicle on public property and may take into custody 7 an abandoned vehicle on private property. The police authority 8 may employ its own personnel, equipment, and facilities or 9 hire a private entity, equipment, and facilities for the 10 purpose of removing, preserving, storing, or disposing of 11 abandoned vehicles. A property owner or other person in 12 control of private property may employ a private entity who 13 is a garagekeeper, as defined in section 321.90 , to dispose 14 of an abandoned vehicle, and the private entity may take into 15 custody the abandoned vehicle without a police authorityâs 16 initiative. If a police authority employs a private entity 17 to dispose of abandoned vehicles, the police authority shall 18 provide the private entity with the names and addresses of the 19 registered owners, all lienholders of record, and any other 20 known claimant to the vehicle or the personal property found in 21 the vehicle. The owners, lienholders, or other claimants of 22 the abandoned vehicle shall not have a cause of action against 23 a private entity for action taken under this section if the 24 private entity provides notice , allows inspection, and provides 25 information about the vehicle as required by subsection 3 , 26 paragraphs âaâ through âfâ . 27 Sec. 2. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraphs a, e, and 28 f, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 29 a. A police authority or private entity that takes into 30 custody an abandoned vehicle shall send notice by certified 31 mail that the vehicle has been taken into custody no more than 32 twenty five days after taking custody of the vehicle. Notice 33 shall be sent to the last known address of record of the last 34 known registered owner of the vehicle, all lienholders of 35 -1- LSB 2006XC (3) 91 th/ns 1/ 5 S.F. _____ record, and any other known claimant to the vehicle. 1 e. If the persons receiving notice do not ask for a hearing 2 or exercise their right to reclaim the vehicle or personal 3 property within the ten-day twenty-day reclaiming period, the 4 owner, lienholders, or claimants shall no longer have any 5 right, title, claim, or interest in or to the vehicle or the 6 personal property. If proper notice and an opportunity to 7 inspect the vehicle is not provided to the owners, lienholders, 8 and known claimants, there shall be no forfeiture of the 9 personâs right, title, claim, or interest in or to the vehicle 10 and personal property, as applicable. 11 f. A court in any case in law or equity shall not recognize 12 any right, title, claim, or interest of the owner, lienholders, 13 or claimants after the expiration of the ten-day twenty-day 14 reclaiming period if proper notice is provided to the owners, 15 lienholders, and known claimants as required in this subsection 16 and such persons were provided timely opportunity to inspect 17 the vehicle and retrieve personal property, as applicable . 18 Sec. 3. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph b, 19 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 20 (3) Information for the persons receiving the notice of 21 their right to inspect and reclaim the vehicle and personal 22 property contained therein within ten twenty days after the 23 effective date of the notice. Persons may reclaim the vehicle 24 or personal property upon payment of all reasonable towing, 25 preservation, and storage charges resulting from placing the 26 vehicle in custody and upon payment of the costs of notice 27 required pursuant to this subsection . Persons may reclaim any 28 personal property from a vehicle during the normal business 29 hours of the entity with custody of the vehicle at no cost and 30 without reclaiming the vehicle. 31 Sec. 4. Section 321.89, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 32 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 33 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (6) An itemized account of all fees to be 34 assessed when the vehicle is reclaimed. 35 -2- LSB 2006XC (3) 91 th/ns 2/ 5 S.F. _____ Sec. 5. Section 321.89, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 1 by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. A person who receives notice under 3 this subsection may request to inspect the vehicle or personal 4 property contained therein, or receive specific information 5 as to the condition of the vehicle or personal property, and 6 if requested, the entity with custody of the vehicle shall 7 provide the requested information or an opportunity to inspect 8 the vehicle, as applicable, prior to the expiration of the 9 twenty-day reclamation period. If the entity with custody of 10 the vehicle fails to timely provide the requested information 11 or an opportunity to inspect the vehicle and personal property 12 therein, the entity shall not sell or dispose of the vehicle or 13 personal property until the requested information is provided 14 or the inspection occurs, at which point the period to reclaim 15 the vehicle is extended for five additional days after the 16 information is provided or the inspection takes place. 17 Sec. 6. Section 321.89, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 4. Reclamation of abandoned vehicles and personal 20 property . An entity with custody of an abandoned vehicle shall 21 provide an itemized account of all fees assessed when the 22 vehicle is reclaimed. Prior to driving an abandoned vehicle 23 away from the premises, a person who received , or who is 24 reclaiming the vehicle on behalf of a person who received , 25 notice under subsection 3 shall present to the police authority 26 or private entity, as applicable, the personâs valid driverâs 27 license and proof of financial liability coverage as provided 28 in section 321.20B . During the normal business hours of the 29 entity with custody of the vehicle, a person may retrieve the 30 personâs personal property left in the vehicle at no cost and 31 without reclaiming the vehicle. 32 Sec. 7. Section 321.89, subsection 5, Code 2025, is amended 33 by adding the following new paragraph: 34 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. If an abandoned vehicle is sold and the 35 -3- LSB 2006XC (3) 91 th/ns 3/ 5 S.F. _____ entity that took the vehicle into custody failed to provide 1 the required notice and opportunity to inspect and reclaim the 2 vehicle and personal property, as applicable, the entity who 3 sold the vehicle shall pay a lienholder, if applicable, the 4 amount remaining on the vehicle loan. 5 Sec. 8. Section 321.90, subsection 2, paragraph f, Code 6 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 f. The owner of an abandoned motor vehicle and all 8 lienholders shall no longer have any right, title, claim, or 9 interest in or to the motor vehicle; and no court in any case 10 in law or equity shall recognize any right, title, claim, or 11 interest of any owner or lienholders after the disposal of the 12 motor vehicle to a demolisher , so long as proper notice and an 13 opportunity to inspect the vehicle and personal property in 14 accordance with section 321.89, subsection 3, was provided . 15